District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.26

Termination of security requirement.

Repealed.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 127, ch. 222, § 26
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-426.
1973 Ed., § 40-442.